Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9606
Manufacturer; provide without compensation.

A manufacturer may provide an investigational drug, biological product, or device to an eligible patient without receiving compensation.

Laws 2018, LB117, § 6.
July 19, 2018